Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
State Police Retirement System

16.505.
Definitions for KRS 16.505 to 16.652.

As used in KRS

16.505

to

16.652

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“System” means the State Police Retirement System created by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

;

“Board” means the board of trustees of the Kentucky Retirement Systems;

“Employer” or “State Police” means the Department of Kentucky State Police, or its successor;

“Current service” means the number of years and completed months of employment as an employee subsequent to July 1, 1958, for which creditable compensation was paid by the employer and employee contributions deducted except as otherwise provided;

“Prior service” means the number of years and completed months of employment as an employee prior to July 1, 1958, for which creditable compensation was paid to the employee by the Commonwealth. Twelve (12) months of current service in the system are required to validate prior service;

“Service” means the total of current service and prior service;

“Accumulated contributions” at any time means the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the member’s account, including employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 16.545(4), together with interest credited on such amounts as provided in KRS

16.505

to

16.652

, and any other amounts the member shall have contributed, including interest credited. For members who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008, “accumulated contributions” shall not include employee contributions that are deposited into accounts established pursuant to 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(h)

within the funds established in KRS

16.510

and

61.515

, as prescribed by KRS 61.702(3)(b);

“Creditable compensation”:

Means all salary and wages, including payments for compensatory time, paid to the employee as a result of services performed for the employer or for time during which the member is on paid leave, which are includable on the member’s federal form W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading “wages, tips, other compensation,” including employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 16.545(4);

Includes:

Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for purchase of service credit, which shall be averaged over the employee’s total service with the system in which it is recorded if it is equal to or greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000);

Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Commission on Human Rights, or for any creditable compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Commission on Human Rights, including notices of violations of state or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or federal discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer. This subparagraph shall also include lump-sum payments for reinstated wages pursuant to KRS

61.569

, which shall be credited to the period during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer;

Amounts which are not includable in the member’s gross income by virtue of the member having taken a voluntary salary reduction provided for under applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code; and

Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made available on or after January 1, 2001, for calendar years on or after January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross income of the employee by reason of 26

U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4)

; and

Excludes:

Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for accrued vacation leave, and other items determined by the board;

For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008, lump-sum payments for compensatory time; and

Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky State Police school resource officer as defined by KRS

158.441

;

“Final compensation” means:

For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, the creditable compensation of a member during the three (3) fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit during the three (3) year period, multiplied by twelve (12); the three (3) years may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3) year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used; or

For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, the creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the member does not have three (3) complete fiscal years that each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be added until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at least thirty-six (36) months;

“Final rate of pay” means the actual rate upon which earnings of a member were calculated during the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the member’s effective retirement date, including employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 16.545(4). The rate shall be certified to the system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used to convert the rate to an annual rate: two thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8) hour workdays, one thousand nine hundred fifty (1,950) hours for seven and one-half (7-1/2) hour workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks, twelve (12) months, or one (1) year;

“Retired member” means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or any former member who has filed the necessary documents for retirement benefits and is no longer contributing to the retirement system;

“Retirement allowance” means the retirement payments to which a retired member is entitled;

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of actuarial tables adopted by the board. In cases of disability retirement, the options authorized by KRS

61.635

shall be computed by adding ten (10) years to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social Security adjustment option as provided for in KRS

61.635

(8), in which case the member’s actual age shall be used. For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement option shall be less than the same option computed under early retirement;

“Authorized leave of absence” means any time during which a person is absent from employment but retained in the status of an employee in accordance with the personnel policy of the Department of Kentucky State Police;

“Normal retirement date” means:

For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a member’s fifty-fifth birthday, except that for members over age fifty-five (55) on July 1, 1958, it shall mean January 1, 1959; or

For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a member’s sixtieth birthday;

“Disability retirement date” means the first day of the month following the last day of paid employment;

“Dependent child” means a child in the womb and a natural or legally adopted child of the member who has neither attained age eighteen (18) nor married or who is an unmarried full-time student who has not attained age twenty-two (22). Solely in the cases where a member dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this section, dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS

61.621

, becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in the line of duty as defined in this section, or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS

61.621

and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), “dependent child” also means a naturally or legally adopted disabled child of the member, regardless of the child’s age, if the child has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits or is being claimed as a qualifying child for tax purposes due to the child’s total and permanent disability;

“Optional allowance” means an actuarially equivalent benefit elected by the member in lieu of all other benefits provided by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

;

“Act in line of duty” means:

A single act occurring or a single thing done, which, as determined by the board, was required in the performance of the duties specified in KRS

16.060

;

For employees in hazardous positions under KRS

61.592

, a single act occurring which was required in the performance of the principal duties of the position as defined by the job description; or

For employees participating in the State Police Retirement System and for employees who are in hazardous positions under KRS

61.592

, a single act of violence committed against the employee that is found to be related to his or her job duties, whether or not it occurs at his or her job site;

“Early retirement date” means:

For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, the retirement date declared by a member who is not less than fifty (50) years of age and has fifteen (15) years of service; or

For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, the retirement date declared by a member who is not less than fifty (50) years of age and has fifteen (15) years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1) or 61.543(1) or another state-administered retirement system;

“Member” means any officer included in the membership of the system as provided under KRS

16.520

whose membership has not been terminated under KRS

61.535

;

“Regular full-time officers” means the occupants of positions as set forth in KRS

16.010

;

“Hazardous disability” as used in KRS

16.505

to

16.652

means a disability which results in an employee’s total incapacity to continue as an employee in a hazardous position, but the employee is not necessarily deemed to be totally and permanently disabled to engage in other occupations for remuneration or profit;

“Current rate of pay” means the member’s actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly, monthly, or yearly rate of pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;

“Beneficiary” means the person, persons, estate, trust, or trustee designated by the member in accordance with KRS

61.542

or

61.705

to receive any available benefits in the event of the member’s death. As used in KRS

61.702

, “beneficiary” does not mean an estate, trust, or trustee;

“Recipient” means the retired member, the person or persons designated as beneficiary by the member and drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the member’s death, or a dependent child drawing a retirement allowance. An alternate payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient, except for purposes of KRS

61.623

;

“Person” means a natural person;

“Retirement office” means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority office building in Frankfort, unless otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority;

“Vested” for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under KRS

61.552

means the employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60) months of service if under the age of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, “service” shall mean service in the systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees Retirement System;

“Last day of paid employment” means the last date employer and employee contributions are required to be reported in accordance with KRS

16.543

or

61.543

to the retirement office in order for the employee to receive current service credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the employee receives payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise, if that date occurs twenty-four (24) or more months after previous contributions;

“Objective medical evidence” means reports of examinations or treatments; medical signs which are anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can be observed; psychiatric signs which are medically demonstrable phenomena indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory, orientation, or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological, or psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory diagnostic techniques, including but not limited to chemical tests, electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and psychological tests;

“Fiscal year” of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the following June 30, which shall also be the plan year. The “fiscal year” shall be the limitation year used to determine contribution and benefit limits established by 26

U.S.C. sec. 415

;

“Participating” means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system as provided in KRS

16.543

;

“Month” means a calendar month;

“Membership date” means the date upon which the member began participating in the system as provided by KRS

16.543

;

“Participant” means a member, as defined by subsection (21) of this section, or a retired member, as defined by subsection (11) of this section;

“Qualified domestic relations order” means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:

Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and

Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital property rights to an alternate payee;

“Alternate payee” means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic relations order;

“Accumulated employer credit” means the employer pay credit deposited to the member’s account and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS

16.583

;

“Accumulated account balance” means:

For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, the member’s accumulated contributions; or

For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS

16.583

, the combined sum of the member’s accumulated contributions and the member’s accumulated employer pay credit; and

“Monthly average pay” means:

In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this section or who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS

61.621

, the higher of the member’s monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or

In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in this section or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS

61.621

and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the member’s monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the disabled member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty or duty-related injury occurred.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 1; 1964, ch. 91, § 1; 1966, ch. 33, § 1; 1968, ch. 25, § 1; 1970, ch. 76, § 1; 1972, ch. 116, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(3); 1974, ch. 128, § 1; 1976, ch. 321, § 1, 40; 1978, ch. 311, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 535, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 186, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 166, § 24, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 423, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 95, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 90, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 331, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 349, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 240, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 485, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 300, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 210, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 385, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 52, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 169, § 1, effective March 31, 2003; 2004, ch. 36, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 85, § 72, effective June 26, 2007; 2008 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 6, effective June 27, 2008; 2009, ch. 77, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 148, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 120, § 34, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 151, § 1, effective April 13, 2018; 2018 ch. 107, § 13, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 197, § 3, effective April 9, 2019; 2021 ch. 102, § 31, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 106, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). See
2021 Ky. Acts Ch. 106, secs. 10,
11,
12, and
13 for information regarding the application of the amendments to this statute made in that Act.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

(7/14/2018). This statute was amended by
2018 Ky. Acts chs. 107 and
151, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

16.510.
Retirement system established — Fund created.

There is hereby created and established:

A retirement system for state police to be known as the “State Police Retirement System” by and in which name it shall, pursuant to the provisions of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

, transact all of its business, and shall have the powers and privileges of a corporation; and

A fund, to be known as the “State Police Retirement Fund,” which shall consist of all the assets of the system as set forth in KRS

16.555

. All assets received in the fund shall be deemed trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in KRS

16.505

to KRS

16.652

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 2, effective July 1, 1958; 2004, ch. 36, § 2, effective July 13, 2004.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A slight variation in the name of the fund from that directed by the statutes would not invalidate the security or becloud the ownership therein, since former KRS

355.8-308

(2) (now repealed) of the Uniform Commercial Code provides that a special indorsement is one that specifies the person to whom the security is transferred.

OAG 61-478

.

Securities purchased for the state police retirement system may be registered in the name of “State Police Retirement System of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.”

OAG 61-478

.

16.515.
Former membership in Kentucky employes retirement system. [Repealed.]

16.517.
Transfer of conservation officers to State Police Retirement System; Conditions. [Repealed.]

16.520.
Membership in the system.

Membership in the system shall consist of all regular full-time officers of the Department of Kentucky State Police appointed pursuant to KRS

16.050

who are entitled to exercise the powers of peace officers.

Membership in the system shall not include those employees who are simultaneously participating in another state-administered defined benefit plan within Kentucky other than those administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems, except for employees who have ceased to contribute to one (1) of the state-administered retirement plans as provided in KRS

21.360

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 4; 1968, ch. 139; 1970, ch. 76, § 2; 1972, ch. 116, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(4); 1974, ch. 128, § 2; 1976, ch. 321, § 2; 1986, ch. 90, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 349, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 222, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 485, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 105, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 73, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 32, § 2, effective June 28, 2017.

16.525.
Cessation of membership. [Repealed.]

16.527.
Reinstatement of lost service credit. [Repealed.]

16.530.
Membership statements and certificates.

Under such rules and regulations as are adopted by the board, each employee becoming a member on July 1, 1958, shall have on file at the retirement office, on such forms as the board may prescribe, a statement of the facts pertaining to his status as a member which shall include a detailed description of all service rendered prior to July 1, 1958. Until such statement is filed, no member shall be entitled to receive any benefits under KRS

16.505

to

16.652

. As soon as practicable after said statement is filed, the system shall ascertain the amount of prior service, if any, to which each member is entitled and shall issue to each member a certificate certifying the length of such service rendered by him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 6, effective July 1, 1958; 1992, ch. 240, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2009, ch. 77, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

16.532.
Beneficiaries to be designated by member — Change — Rights. [Repealed.]

16.535.
Years of service. [Repealed.]

16.537.
Service credit for other public employment by delayed contribution payment — Recalculation of benefits for retirees. [Repealed.]

16.540.
Leave of absence. [Repealed.]

16.541.
Credit for service in United States armed forces. [Repealed.]

16.543.
Determination of service credit — Picked-up employee contributions — Service earned while on leave — Refund.

Employee contributions shall be deducted from the creditable compensation of each member of the retirement system in the active employment of the Department of Kentucky State Police of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet as an officer as defined in KRS

16.520

. After August 1, 1982, employee contributions shall be picked up by the employer pursuant to KRS 16.545(4). Service credit shall be allowed for each month such member receives creditable compensation for an average of one hundred (100) hours or more of work per month. If the average number of hours of work is less than one hundred (100) per month, the member shall be allowed credit only for those months he or she receives creditable compensation for one hundred (100) hours of work.

Contributions shall not be made and no service will be earned while on authorized leave except:

A member shall be entitled to service credit in accordance with KRS

61.552

; and

A member on educational leave, approved by the Personnel Cabinet, who is receiving seventy-five percent (75%) or more of full salary, shall receive service credit and shall pay member contributions or such contributions shall be picked up in accordance with KRS

16.545

and his or her employer shall pay employer contributions in accordance with KRS

61.565

. If a tuition agreement is broken by the member, the member and employer contributions paid or picked up during the period of educational leave shall be refunded.

The retirement office, upon detection, shall refund any erroneous employer and employee contributions made to the retirement system and any interest credited in accordance with KRS

16.560

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 116, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(1), (3); 1976, ch. 321, § 4; 1978, ch. 311, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 166, §§ 9, 26, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 90, § 29, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 240, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 154, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 74, effective June 26, 2007; 2021 ch. 102, § 32, effective April 1, 2021.

16.545.
Contributions of members — Picked-up employee contributions.

Except for members over age fifty-five (55) on July 1, 1958, who shall not be required to contribute, each member shall, commencing on July 1, 1998, contribute for each pay period for which he receives compensation, eight percent (8%) of his creditable compensation.

The employer shall cause to be deducted from the compensation of each member for each and every payroll period subsequent to July 1, 1958, the contributions payable by such member as provided in KRS

16.510

to

16.652

.

Every member shall be deemed to consent to deductions made as provided herein; and the payment of salary or compensation less such deduction shall be a full and complete discharge of all claims for services rendered by such person during the period covered by such payment, except as to any benefits provided by KRS

16.510

to

16.652

.

Each employer shall, solely for the purpose of compliance with Section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, pick up the employee contributions required by this section for all compensation earned after August 1, 1982, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and KRS

141.010

. These contributions shall not be included as gross income of the employee until such time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee. The picked-up employee contribution shall satisfy all obligations to the retirement system satisfied prior to August 1, 1982, by the employee contribution, and the picked-up employee contribution shall be in lieu of an employee contribution. Each employer shall pay these picked-up employee contributions from the same source of funds which is used to pay earnings to the employee. The employee shall have no option to receive the contributed amounts directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the system. Employee contributions picked up after August 1, 1982, shall be treated for all purposes of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

in the same manner and to the same extent as employee contributions made prior to August 1, 1982.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 9; 1964, ch. 91, § 4; 1968, ch. 25, § 2; 1972, ch. 116, § 6; 1976, ch. 321, § 40; 1982, ch. 166, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 90, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. VII D, § 641, effective April 11, 1990; 1998, ch. 300, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 171, § 64, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 64, effective April 27, 2018.

16.550.
Contributions of employer. [Repealed.]

16.551.
Employer’s contribution, how determined. [Repealed.]

16.555.
Assets of the system — Accounts.

All the assets of the system shall be held and invested in the State Police Retirement Fund and credited, according to the purpose for which they are held, to one (1) of three (3) accounts: the “members’ account,” the “retirement allowance account,” and accounts established pursuant to 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(h)

within the funds established in KRS

16.510

and

61.515

, as prescribed by KRS 61.702(3)(b).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 11, effective July 1, 1958; 2009, ch. 77, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 120, § 35, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 102, § 33, effective April 1, 2021.

16.560.
Member account.

The member account shall be the account to which:

All members’ contributions, or contributions picked up by the employer after August 1, 1982, and interest allowances as provided in KRS

16.505

to

16.652

shall be credited, except as provided by KRS 61.702(2)(b); and

For members who begin participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, the employer pay credit and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS

16.583

shall be credited.

Only funds from this account shall be used to return accumulated contributions or accumulated account balances of a member when required by reason of any provision of KRS

16.505

to

16.652

. Prior to the member’s retirement, death, or refund in accordance with KRS

61.625

, no funds shall be made available from the member’s account.

Each member’s contribution or contribution picked up by the employer shall be credited to the individual account of the contributing member, except as provided by KRS 61.702(2)(b).

Each member shall have his individual account credited with interest on June 30 of each fiscal year.

For members who begin participating before September 1, 2008, interest shall be credited to their individual account at a rate determined by the board but not less than two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum on the accumulated account balance of the member on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year.

For members who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, interest shall be credited to their individual account at a rate of two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum on the accumulated account balance of the member on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year.

For members who begin participating on or after January 1, 2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan, interest shall be credited to their individual account in accordance with KRS

16.583

.

The amounts of interest credited to a member’s account under this subsection and KRS

16.583

and the employer pay credit as provided by KRS 16.583 shall be transferred from the retirement allowance account.

Upon the retirement of a member who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014, his or her accumulated account balance shall be transferred from the member’s account to the retirement allowance account.

Upon the retirement of a member who began participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014, who elects to annuitize his or her accumulated account balance as prescribed by KRS 16.583(7)(a) or (b), the member’s accumulated account balance shall be transferred to the retirement allowance account.

Included as a part of such member’s account shall be his accumulated account balance in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, if any, transferred to this system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 12; 1972, ch. 116, § 8; 1976, ch. 321, § 40; 1978, ch. 311, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 166, § 27, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 385, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2008 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 7, effective June 27, 2008; 2009, ch. 77, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 120, § 36, effective July 1, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2008). The Reviser of Statutes has altered the numbering of subsection (3) of this statute from the way it appeared in 2008 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 7, under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(c).

16.565.
Retirement allowance account. [Effective until April 1, 2023]

The retirement allowance account shall be the account in which shall be accumulated all employer contributions, amounts transferred from the member account, and to which all income from the investment assets of the system shall be credited. From this account there shall be paid administrative expenses and in addition all benefits payable under KRS

16.510

to

16.652

. There shall be transferred from this account to the member account:

The employer pay credit added monthly to each member’s individual accounts as provided by KRS

16.583

; and

The interest credited annually to each member’s individual accounts as provided by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 13, effective July 1, 1958; 2013, ch. 120, § 37, effective July 1, 2013.

16.565.
Retirement allowance account. [Effective April 1, 2023]

The retirement allowance account shall be the account in which shall be accumulated all employer contributions, amounts transferred from the member account, and to which all income from the investment assets of the system shall be credited. From this account there shall be paid administrative expenses and in addition all benefits payable under KRS

16.510

to

16.652

. There shall be transferred from this account to the member account:

The employer pay credit added monthly to each member’s individual accounts as provided by KRS 16.583(2)(b)1. or annually as provided by KRS 16.583(2)(b)2. and

16.584

; and

The interest credited annually to each member’s individual accounts as provided by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 13, effective July 1, 1958; 2013, ch. 120, § 37, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 181, § 6, effective April 1, 2023.

16.566.
Member to file with board upon retirement. [Repealed.]

16.567.
Calculation of retirement allowance. [Repealed.]

16.568.
Excess benefit plan — Purpose — Excess benefit fund.

There are created and established:

An excess benefit plan to be known as the State Police Retirement System Excess Benefit Plan. The plan is created for the purpose of providing the retirement allowances payable from the retirement system under KRS

16.510

to

16.652

that would otherwise be limited by 26

U.S.C. sec. 415

; and

A state fund to be known as the “State Police Retirement System Excess Benefit Fund” which shall consist of all the assets of the plan.

The administration and assets of the plan shall be as set forth in KRS

61.652

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 385, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

16.570.
Deposits. [Repealed.]

16.573.
Refund of contributions — Conditions. [Repealed.]

16.575.
Minimum benefits. [Repealed.]